dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi pronomenali (takai senŧa èle vanesente)
SFX P2 Y 153
SFX P2 0 lo r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 0 la r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 0 li r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 0 le r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 ar àrgel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ar àrgelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ar àrgeli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ar àrgela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ar àrgele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ar àrmel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrmelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrmeli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrmela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrmele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrsel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrselo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrseli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrsela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrsele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrtel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrtelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrteli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrtela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrtele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrvel ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrvelo ar	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrveli ar	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrvela ar	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ar àrvele ar	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érgel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 er érgelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 er érgeli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 er érgela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 er érgele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 er érmel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érmelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érmeli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érmela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érmele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érsel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érselo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érseli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érsela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érsele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er értel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er értelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érteli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er értela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er értele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érvel er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érvelo er	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érveli er	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érvela er	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 er érvele er	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írgel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ir írgelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ir írgeli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ir írgela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ir írgele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 ir írmel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írmelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írmeli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írmela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írmele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írsel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írselo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írseli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írsela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írsele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írtel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írtelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írteli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írtela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írtele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írvel ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írvelo ir	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írveli ir	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írvela ir	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 ir írvele ir	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel lo [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 gel la [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 gel li [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 gel le [aàeéèiïíoóòuüú]gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX P2 gel mel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel melo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel mela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel meli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel mele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel sel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel selo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel sela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel seli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel sele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel tel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel telo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel tela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel teli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel tele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel vel gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel velo gel	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel vela gel	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel veli gel	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 gel vele gel	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi gel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 mi gelo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 mi geli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 mi gela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 mi gele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 i el omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 i elo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 i eli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 i ela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 i ele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi sel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi selo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi seli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi sela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi sele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi tel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi telo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi teli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi tela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi tele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi vel omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi velo omi	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi veli omi	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi vela omi	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 mi vele omi	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 gel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 0 gelo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 0 geli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 0 gela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 0 gele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX P2 0 mel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 melo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 meli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 mela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 mele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 sel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 selo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 seli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 sela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 sele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 tel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 telo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 teli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 tela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 tele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 vel o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 velo o	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 veli o	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 vela o	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX P2 0 vele o	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
